Illinois, session 104th, SB3910.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 3. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5adding Section 40.4 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/40.4 new)7    Sec. 40.4. Permits for the sale of treated 8wastewater.Within one year after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Agency shall 10establish a process for sanitary districts to obtain a permit 11to sell treated wastewater. 12    Section 5. The Sanitary District Act of 1907 is amended by 13adding Section 14.5 as follows: 14    (70 ILCS 2205/14.5 new)15    Sec. 14.5. Private agreements for wastewater treatment.16    (a) The board of trustees of a sanitary district organized 17under this Act may enter into an agreement to sell, convey, or 18disburse treated wastewater to a private entity located within 1950 miles of the district's boundaries. The agreement may not 20exceed 30 years. The district may also accept wastewater for 21treatment from a private entity located within 50 miles of the   SB3910- 2 -LRB104 18685 RTM 32128 b1district's boundaries.2    (b) In addition, the district may acquire and accept, by 3gift, grant, purchase, or otherwise, pursuant to its authority 4under this Act, a fee simple interest or any lesser interest as 5may be desired in real property necessary to carry out its 6powers under this Section.7    (c) This Section does not apply to private entities 8located outside of the State. 9    Section 10. The North Shore Water Reclamation District Act 10is amended by changing Section 7 as follows: 11    (70 ILCS 2305/7)  (from Ch. 42, par. 283)12    Sec. 7. Powers of the board of trustees. The board of 13trustees of any sanitary district organized under this Act may 14provide for the treatment of the sewage thereof and save and 15preserve the water supplied to the inhabitants of such 16district from contamination. For that purpose the board may 17construct and maintain an enclosed conduit or conduits, main 18pipes, wholly or partially submerged, buried or otherwise, and 19by means of pumps or otherwise cause such sewage to flow or to 20be forced through such conduit or conduits, pipe or pipes to 21and into any ditch or canal constructed and operated by any 22other sanitary district, after having first acquired the right 23so to do. Such board may provide for the drainage of such 24district by laying out, establishing, constructing and   SB3910- 3 -LRB104 18685 RTM 32128 b1maintaining one or more channels, drains, ditches and outlets 2for carrying off and disposing of the drainage (including the 3sewage) of such district, together with such adjuncts and 4additions thereto as may be necessary or proper to cause such 5channels or outlets to accomplish the end for which they are 6designed, in a satisfactory manner, including pumps and 7pumping stations and the operation of the same. Such board 8shall provide suitable and modernly equipped sewage treatment 9works or plants for the separation and treatment of all solids 10and deleterious matter from the liquids, and shall treat and 11purify the residue of such sewage so that when it flows into 12any lake, it will not injuriously contaminate the waters 13thereof. The board shall adopt any feasible method to 14accomplish the object for which such sanitary district may be 15created, and may also provide means whereby the sanitary 16district may reach and procure supplies of water for diluting 17and flushing purposes. The board of trustees of any sanitary 18district formed under this Act may also enter into an 19agreement to sell, convey, or disburse treated wastewater to 20any public or private entity located within 50 miles of the 21district's boundaries. or outside of the boundaries of the 22sanitary district. Any use of treated wastewater by any public 23or private entity shall be subject to the orders of the 24Pollution Control Board. The agreement may not exceed 30 20 25years. 26    Nothing set forth in this Section may be construed to   SB3910- 4 -LRB104 18685 RTM 32128 b1empower, authorize or require such board of trustees to 2operate a system of water works for the purpose of furnishing 3or delivering water to any such municipality or to the 4inhabitants thereof without payment therefor at such rates as 5the board may determine. Nothing in this Act shall require a 6sanitary district to extend service to any individual 7residence or other building within the district, and it is the 8intent of the Illinois General Assembly that any construction 9contemplated by this Section shall be restricted to 10construction of works and main or interceptor sewers, 11conduits, channels and similar facilities, but not individual 12service lines. Nothing in this Act contained authorizes the 13trustees to flow the sewage of such district into Lake 14Michigan. Any such plan for sewage disposal by any sanitary 15district organized hereunder is prohibited, unless such sewage 16has been treated and purified as provided in this Section, all 17laws of the Federal government relating to the pollution of 18navigable waters have been complied with, the approval of 19plans and constructions of outlets and connection with any of 20the streams or navigable bodies of water within or bordering 21upon the State has been obtained from the Department of 22Natural Resources of the State. The discharge of any sewage 23from any such district into any of the streams or navigable 24bodies of water within or bordering upon the State is subject 25to the orders of the Pollution Control Board. Nothing in this 26Act contained may be construed as superseding or in any manner   SB3910- 5 -LRB104 18685 RTM 32128 b1limiting the provisions of the Environmental Protection Act.2    After the construction of such sewage disposal plant, if 3the board finds that it will promote the prevention of 4pollution of waters of the State, such board of trustees may 5adopt ordinances or rules and regulations, prohibiting or 6regulating the discharge to sewers of inadmissible wastes or 7substances toxic to biological wastewater treatment processes. 8Inadmissible wastes include those which create a fire or 9explosion hazard in the sewer or treatment works; those which 10will impair the hydraulic capacity of sewer systems; and those 11which in any quantity, create a hazard to people, sewer 12systems, treatment processes, or receiving waters. Substances 13that may be toxic to wastewater treatment processes include 14copper, chromium, lead, zinc, arsenic, nickel, barium, 15cadmium, mercury, selenium, silver, and any poisonous 16compounds such as cyanide or radioactive wastes which pass 17through wastewater treatment plants in hazardous 18concentrations and menace users of the receiving waters. Such 19ordinances or rules and regulations shall be effective 20throughout the sanitary district, in the incorporated areas as 21well as the unincorporated areas and all public sewers 22therein.23(Source: P.A. 100-31, eff. 8-4-17.) 24    Section 15. The Sanitary District Act of 1917 is amended 25by changing Section 7.9 as follows:   SB3910- 6 -LRB104 18685 RTM 32128 b1    (70 ILCS 2405/7.9)2    Sec. 7.9. Private agreements for wastewater treatment. 3    (a) The board of trustees of a sanitary district organized 4under this Act the Sanitary District of Decatur or the 5Bloomington and Normal Water Reclamation District may enter 6into an agreement to sell, convey, or disburse treated 7wastewater to a private entity located within 50 miles of the 8district's District's boundaries. The agreement may not exceed 930 years. The district Sanitary District of Decatur or the 10Bloomington and Normal Water Reclamation District may also 11accept wastewater for treatment from a private entity located 12within 50 miles of the district's boundaries.13    (b) In addition, the district Sanitary District of Decatur 14or the Bloomington and Normal Water Reclamation District may 15acquire and accept, by gift, grant, purchase, or otherwise, 16pursuant to its authority under this Act, a fee simple 17interest or any lesser interest as may be desired in real 18property necessary to carry out its powers under this Section. 19    (c) This Section does not apply to private entities 20located outside of the State. 21(Source: P.A. 104-186, eff. 8-15-25.) 22    Section 20. The Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 23Act is amended by adding Section 7i as follows:   SB3910- 7 -LRB104 18685 RTM 32128 b1    (70 ILCS 2605/7i new)2    Sec. 7i. Private agreements for wastewater treatment.3    (a) The board of trustees of a sanitary district organized 4under this Act may enter into an agreement to sell, convey, or 5disburse treated wastewater to a private entity located within 650 miles of the district's boundaries. The agreement may not 7exceed 30 years. The district may also accept wastewater for 8treatment from a private entity located within 50 miles of the 9district's boundaries.10    (b) In addition, the district may acquire and accept, by 11gift, grant, purchase, or otherwise, pursuant to its authority 12under this Act, a fee simple interest or any lesser interest as 13may be desired in real property necessary to carry out its 14powers under this Section.15    (c) This Section does not apply to private entities 16located outside of the State. 17    Section 25. The Sanitary District Act of 1936 is amended 18by adding Section 12.2 as follows: 19    (70 ILCS 2805/12.2 new)20    Sec. 12.2. Private agreements for wastewater treatment.21    (a) The board of trustees of a sanitary district organized 22under this Act may enter into an agreement to sell, convey, or 23disburse treated wastewater to a private entity located within 2450 miles of the district's boundaries. The agreement may not   SB3910- 8 -LRB104 18685 RTM 32128 b1exceed 30 years. The district may also accept wastewater for 2treatment from a private entity located within 50 miles of the 3district's boundaries.4    (b) In addition, the district may acquire and accept, by 5gift, grant, purchase, or otherwise, pursuant to its authority 6under this Act, a fee simple interest or any lesser interest as 7may be desired in real property necessary to carry out its 8powers under this Section.9    (c) This Section does not apply to private entities 10located outside of the State. 11    Section 30. The Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974 12is amended by adding Section 2-5.5 as follows: 13    (70 ILCS 2905/2-5.5 new)14    Sec. 2-5.5. Private agreements for wastewater treatment.15    (a) The board of trustees of a sanitary district organized 16under this Act may enter into an agreement to sell, convey, or 17disburse treated wastewater to a private entity located within 1850 miles of the district's boundaries. The agreement may not 19exceed 30 years. The district may also accept wastewater for 20treatment from a private entity located within 50 miles of the 21district's boundaries.22    (b) In addition, the district may acquire and accept, by 23gift, grant, purchase, or otherwise, pursuant to its authority 24under this Act, a fee simple interest or any lesser interest as   SB3910- 9 -LRB104 18685 RTM 32128 b1may be desired in real property necessary to carry out its 2powers under this Section.3    (c) This Section does not apply to private entities 4located outside of the State. 5    Section 35. The Eastern Will Sanitary District Act is 6amended by adding Section 25 as follows: 7    (70 ILCS 3020/25 new)8    Sec. 25. Private agreements for wastewater treatment.9    (a) The board of trustees of the District may enter into an 10agreement to sell, convey, or disburse treated wastewater to a 11private entity located within 50 miles of the District's 12boundaries. The agreement may not exceed 30 years. The 13District may also accept wastewater for treatment from a 14private entity located within 50 miles of the district's 15boundaries.16    (b) In addition, the District may acquire and accept, by 17gift, grant, purchase, or otherwise, pursuant to its authority 18under this Act, a fee simple interest or any lesser interest as 19may be desired in real property necessary to carry out its 20powers under this Section.21    (c) This Section does not apply to private entities 22located outside of the State. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.  SB3910- 10 -LRB104 18685 RTM 32128 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    415 ILCS 5/40.4 new4    70 ILCS 2205/14.5 new5    70 ILCS 2305/7from Ch. 42, par. 2836    70 ILCS 2405/7.97    70 ILCS 2605/7i new8    70 ILCS 2805/12.2 new9    70 ILCS 2905/2-5.5 new10    70 ILCS 3020/25 new